Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
Article 3 Application of Building and Fire Related Codes to Existing Buildings

8-2-200.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as “The Uniform Act for the Application of Building and Fire Related Codes to Existing Buildings.”

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-200

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1160, § 1.

8-2-201.
Purpose and applicability of article.

It is a purpose of this article to encourage the sensitive rehabilitation, restoration, stabilization, or preservation of existing buildings throughout this state and to encourage the preservation of buildings and structures deemed to be historic in total or in part; provided, however, that such rehabilitation and preservation efforts should provide for the upgrading of the safety features of the building or structure to provide a practical level of safety to the public and surrounding property. It is the further purpose of this article to provide guidance regarding acceptable alternative solutions and to stimulate enforcement authorities to utilize alternative compliance concepts wherever practical to permit the continued use of existing buildings and structures without overly restrictive financial burdens on owners or occupants.

The provisions of this article shall not be applicable to new construction.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-201

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1160, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 8/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “provided, however, that such rehabilitation” for “provided, however, such rehabilitation” in the first sentence of the proviso of subsection (a).

8-2-202.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Enforcement authority” means the Safety Fire Commissioner, the state fire marshal, local building officials, local fire marshals, or any other state or local officials responsible for the implementation, application, or enforcement of any state law or local ordinance relating to building construction, or any state or local rule or regulation relating to building construction, or any building, mechanical, electrical, plumbing, life safety or fire prevention codes, or other construction standards that apply or are intended to apply to existing buildings. The term “enforcement authority” also means any local official designated by the local governing authority as the enforcement authority for the purposes of this article.

“Existing building or structure” means any completed building or structure which has been placed in service for a minimum of five years.

“Safety Fire Commissioner” or “Commissioner” means the office created in Code Section 25-2-2.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-202

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1160, § 1.

8-2-203.
Effect of article on state and local enforcement authorities.

The provisions of this article shall be mandatory and binding on the state fire marshal, the Safety Fire Commissioner, and other state officials responsible for state building code, fire code, life safety code, or other construction code enforcement. This article is not mandatory or binding on local enforcement authorities; provided, however, that any local building, fire, life safety, plumbing, electrical, mechanical, or other construction code enforcement authority may apply the applicable provisions of this article to any existing building whenever the local governing authority has adopted this article by reference and whenever such local code enforcement authority determines the need to utilize compliance alternatives to any provisions of the rules, regulations, codes, or standards he or she is empowered to interpret, apply, or enforce under authority of any state law or local ordinance. This article is a tool for use of code enforcement authorities to use as deemed appropriate in attempting to resolve problems encountered while enforcing codes and standards with regard to existing buildings and structures. Enforcement authorities should advise appropriate appeals boards of the provisions, purposes, and intent of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-203

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1160, § 1.

8-2-204.
Alteration or repair without total compliance with new construction requirements.

The provisions of this article shall require any state code enforcement authority and shall permit any authorized local code enforcement authority to permit the repair, alteration, addition, or change of use or occupancy of existing buildings without total compliance with any state or local rule, regulation, code, or standard for new construction requirements under the following general conditions:

All noted conditions hazardous to life, based on the provisions of applicable state and local standards or codes for existing buildings, shall be corrected to a reasonable and realistic degree as set forth in this article, with specific attention to Code Sections 8-2-214 through 8-2-219;

The existing building becomes the minimum performance standard; and

The degree of compliance of the building after changes must not be below that existing before the changes. Nothing in this article will require nor prohibit compliance with requirements more stringent than those provided in this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-204

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1160, § 1.

8-2-205.
Identification and correction of certain conditions or defects.

With reference to existing buildings, authorized enforcement authorities should give special attention to the conditions or defects described in this Code section in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 8-2-204, so as to assure any such conditions or defects are identified and corrected as deemed appropriate by the enforcement authority having jurisdiction based on applicable state and local codes and through the utilization of appropriate compliance alternatives:

Structural. Any building or structure or portion thereof which is in imminent danger of collapse because of but not limited to the following factors:

Dilapidation, deterioration, or decay;

Faulty structural design or construction;

The removal, movement, or instability of any portion of the ground necessary for the purpose of supporting such building; or

The deterioration, decay, or inadequacy of the foundation;

Number of exits. Less than two approved independent, remote, and properly protected exit ways serving every story of a building, except where a single exit way is permitted by the applicable state or local fire or building code or life safety code;

Capacity of exits. Any required door, aisle, passageway, stairway, or other required means of egress which is not of sufficient capacity to provide for the population of the portions of the building served and which is not so arranged as to provide safe and adequate means of egress to a place of safety; and

Mechanical systems. Utilities and mechanical systems not in conformance with the codes in effect at the time of construction of a building which create a serious threat of fire or threaten the safety of the occupants of the building.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-205

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1160, § 1.

8-2-206.
Consideration of compliance alternatives.

Code Sections 8-2-207 through 8-2-211 contain generally acceptable compliance alternatives illustrating principles which shall be applied to the rehabilitation of existing buildings by state enforcement authorities and which may be applied by authorized local enforcement authorities in Georgia. It is recognized for purposes of this article that all building systems interact with each other; therefore, any consideration of compliance alternatives should take into account all existing and proposed conditions to determine their acceptability. The compliance alternatives are not all-inclusive and do not preclude consideration and approval of other alternatives by any enforcement authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-206

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1160, § 1.

8-2-207.
Compliance alternatives for inadequate number of exits.

Compliance alternatives for an inadequate number of exits include, but are not limited to, the following:

Provide connecting fire-exit balconies acceptable to the enforcement authority between buildings;

Provide alternate exit or egress facilities leading to safety outside the building or to a place of safe refuge in the building or an adjoining building as acceptable to the enforcement authority;

Provide an exterior fire escape or escapes as acceptable to the enforcement authority where the providing of enclosed interior or enclosed exterior stairs is not practical; or

Install early fire warning and fire suppression systems.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-207

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1160, § 1.

8-2-208.
Compliance alternatives for excessive travel distances to approved exit.

Compliance alternatives for excessive travel distances to an approved exit include, but are not limited to, the following:

Install an approved smoke detection system throughout the building;

Install an approved complete automatic fire suppression system;

Subdivide the exit travel route with smoke-stop doors acceptable to the enforcement authority;

Increase the fire resistance rating of corridor walls and doors; or

Provide additional approved means of escape.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-208

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1160, § 1.

8-2-209.
Compliance alternatives for unenclosed or improperly enclosed exit stairways or vertical shafts.

Compliance alternatives for unenclosed or improperly enclosed exit stairways or vertical shafts include, but are not limited to, the following:

Improve enclosure of exit stairway;

Add a partial fire suppression system;

Add a sprinkler draft curtain; or

Add a smoke detection system.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-209

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1160, § 1.

8-2-210.
Compliance alternatives for inadequate fire partitions or walls.

Compliance alternatives for inadequate or a total lack of fire partitions or fire separation walls shall be as set forth in Code Section 8-2-209.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-210

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1160, § 1.

8-2-211.
Compliance alternatives for lack of required protection of openings in exterior walls.

Compliance alternatives for a lack of required protection of openings in exterior walls where a fire exposure is a risk include, but are not limited to, the following:

Improve fire resistance of existing openings and protect them with fire-rated windows or doors as appropriate;

Seal the openings with fire-rated construction as approved by the enforcement authority; or

Install an approved fire suppression system.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-211

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1160, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, “resistance” was substituted for “resistence” in paragraph (1).

8-2-212.
Filing of approved compliance alternatives.

Whenever action is taken on any existing building to repair, make alterations, or change the use or occupancy of an existing structure and, when said action proposes the use of compliance alternatives, the authorized enforcement authority shall ensure that at least one copy of the accepted compliance alternatives approved, including applicable plans, test data, or other data submitted for evaluation, be maintained on file in the office of the local enforcement authority. If said structure also falls under the jurisdiction of a state level enforcement authority, at least one copy of same material shall be maintained on file with that authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-212

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1160, § 1.

8-2-213.
Final review of projects; agreement of local authorities.

Where an existing building or structure falls within the jurisdiction of both state level and local level enforcement authorities, the final review of any part of the project which is under the jurisdiction of both such enforcement authorities shall occur with the state authority; provided, however, that the local fire and building authorities must agree in writing with any compliance alternatives before such can be approved by the state authority. It is the intent of this Code section that the state enforcement authority be very liberal in the consideration and approval of compliance alternatives which have the documented support of local enforcement authorities.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-213

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1160, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 8/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “provided, however, that the local” for “provided, however, the local” in the first sentence of the proviso of this Code section.

8-2-214.
Additions.

Additions to an existing building shall comply with the applicable requirements of state and local laws, rules, regulations, codes, and standards for new construction. Such additions shall not impose loads either vertical or horizontal which would cause the existing building to be subjected to stresses exceeding those permitted under new construction. If the existing building does not comply with the standards provided in this article and the authorized enforcement authority finds that the addition adversely affects the performance of the total building, the authorized enforcement authority may require:

The new addition to be separated from the existing structure by at least a two-hour fire wall with openings therein properly protected; or

The installation of an approved automatic fire suppression system; or

Other remedies which may be deemed appropriate by the enforcement authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-214

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1160, § 1.

8-2-215.
Minor alterations or repairs; reduction or removal of features; alteration or repair without further compliance; installation of mechanical systems.

Minor alterations or repairs to an existing building which do not adversely affect the performance or safety of the building may be made with the same or like materials. Existing buildings which, in part or as a whole, exceed the requirements of any applicable construction or fire safety code, may, in the course of compliance with this article, have reduced or removed, in part or total, features not required by such code for new construction; provided, however, that such features were not a condition of prior approval. Existing buildings and structures which, in part or as a whole, do not meet the requirements of the applicable code for new construction may be altered or repaired without further compliance to any such code by utilizing the provisions of this article, provided that their present degree of compliance to any applicable construction or fire safety code is not reduced. Any new mechanical systems installed in an existing building shall conform to applicable codes for new construction to the fullest extent practical as approved by the authorized enforcement authorities.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-215

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1160, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 8/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “provided that their present” for “provided their present” in the middle of the next-to-last sentence of this Code section.

8-2-216.
Continuation of legal use and occupancy.

The legal use and occupancy of any building or structure may be continued without change, except as may be provided otherwise by this article or as may be legally provided for by any applicable state or local law, ordinance, rule, regulation, code, or standard.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-216

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1160, § 1.

8-2-217.
Total change in use or occupancy.

A total change in the use or occupancy of an existing building which would cause a greater hazard to the public shall not be made unless such building is made to comply with the requirements of the applicable state and local rules, regulations, codes, and standards for the new use or occupancy; provided, however, the compliance alternative provisions of this article may be utilized by authorized enforcement authorities where total or strict compliance with applicable state or local rules, regulations, codes, or standards is not practical.

When the proposed use is of equal or lesser hazard as determined by an authorized enforcement authority, further compliance with any code for new construction is not required unless otherwise provided in this article. Alterations or repairs to an existing building or structure which do not adversely affect the performance of the building may be made with like materials. Any proposed change to the existing building or change in type of contents of the existing building shall not increase the fire hazard to adjacent buildings or structures. If the fire hazard to adjacent buildings or structures is increased, then requirements of applicable construction or fire safety codes for exterior walls shall apply.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-217

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1160, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 8.

8-2-218.
Change of portion of building to new use or occupancy.

If a portion of a building is changed to a new use or occupancy and that portion is separated from the remainder of the building with vertical or horizontal fire separations complying with applicable state or local rules, regulations, codes, or standards or with compliance alternatives, then the portion changed shall be made to comply to the applicable requirements for the new use or occupancy to the extent noted in Code Section 8-2-217.

If a portion of the building is changed to a new use or occupancy and that portion is not separated from the remainder of the building as noted in subsection (a) of this Code section, then the provisions of the applicable state and local rules, regulations, codes, and standards applying to each use or occupancy of the building shall apply to the entire building to the extent noted in Code Section 8-2-217; provided, however, that if there are conflicting provisions in requirements for the various uses or occupancies, the authorized enforcement authority shall apply the strictest requirements.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-218

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1160, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 8/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “provided, however, that if” for “provided, however, if” in the proviso of subsection (b).

8-2-219.
Changes which increase floor loading.

Any proposed change in the use or occupancy of an existing building or portion thereof which could increase the floor loading should be investigated by a Georgia registered professional engineer to determine the adequacy of the existing floor system to support the increased loads. If the existing floor system is found to be inadequate, it should be modified to support the increased loads or the proposed allowable floor loading shall be reduced by and posted by the appropriate enforcement authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-219

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1160, § 1.

8-2-220.
Rules and regulations.

The Safety Fire Commissioner shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations to implement and carry out the requirements of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-220

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1160, § 1.

8-2-221.
Appeals of rulings or decisions.

Should any person, firm, corporation, or other entity be dissatisfied with any ruling or decision of the state fire marshal pursuant to the provisions of this article, the right is granted to appeal within ten days to the Commissioner. If the person, firm, corporation, or other entity is dissatisfied with the decision of the Commissioner, appeal is authorized to the superior court within 30 days in the manner provided under Chapter 13 of Title 50. In the event of such appeal, the person, firm, corporation, or other entity shall give a surety bond which will be conditioned upon compliance with the order and direction of the state fire marshal or the Commissioner or both. The amount of bond shall be fixed by the Commissioner in such amount as will reasonably cover the order issued by the Commissioner or the state fire marshal or both.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-221

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1160, § 1.

8-2-222.
Immunity of state and local entities; liability of property owner or user.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to constitute a waiver of the sovereign immunity of the state or any officer or employee thereof in carrying out the provisions of this article. Further, no action shall be maintained against the state, any municipality, county, or any duly authorized elected or appointed officer or duly authorized employee thereof, for damages sustained as a result of any fire or hazard covered by this article by reason of inspection or other action taken or not taken pursuant to this article. Nothing in this article shall be construed to relieve any property owner or lessee or person in charge thereof from any legal duty, obligation, or liability incident to the ownership, maintenance, or use of such property.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-222

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1160, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 8/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “elected or appointed officer” for “elected or appointive officer” in the middle of the second sentence of this Code section.